New York, session 2025-2026, A7036.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 20 of the executive 2 law, as amended by chapter 23 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 a. "disaster" means occurrence or imminent, impending or urgent threat 5 of wide spread or severe damage, injury, or loss of life or property 6 resulting from any natural or [man-made] human-made causes, including, 7 but not limited to, fire, flood, earthquake, hurricane, tornado, high 8 water, landslide, mudslide, wind, storm, wave action, volcanic activity, 9 epidemic, disease outbreak, air contamination, hazardous air quality, 10 terrorism, cyber event, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, radio- 11 logical accident, nuclear, chemical, biological, or bacteriological 12 release, water contamination, bridge failure or bridge collapse. 13 § 2. Section 23 of the executive law is amended by adding a new subdi- 14 vision 8 to read as follows: 15 8. Such plans shall additionally include, but not be limited to, the 16 following regarding air quality emergencies: 17 a. an action plan for the municipality in the case of an air quality 18 emergency; and 19 b. an annual inventory of the municipality's air quality emergency 20 resources. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10455-01-5